Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-109. New employees — Electronic direct deposit — Definition.

As a condition of employment, a person hired or appointed to a position in any agency in state government on or after August 12, 2005, shall be required to accept payment of salary or wages by electronic warrants transfer.

The electronic warrants transfer shall be made in the form of a direct deposit of funds to the account of the beneficiary of the payment in any financial institution equipped for electronic fund transfers, provided that the financial institution is designated in writing by the beneficiary and has lawful authority to accept such deposits.

Any person affected by the direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may request an exemption from the requirement.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may grant an exemption from the direct deposit requirement upon a showing of hardship to the person requesting the exemption or upon any other reasonable basis.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish the standards and procedures for granting an exemption from the direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

The direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not apply to a person who is in the employment of the state prior to August 12, 2005, and subsequently receives a promotion appointment, transfer, or other change in position within the same personnel system on or after August 12, 2005.

As used in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, “agency” means all state agencies, boards, commissions, bureaus, councils, or programs except:

The elected constitutional officers of the State of Arkansas and their employees;

The General Assembly and its employees, including employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative Audit;

Members and employees of the Supreme Court, the Administrative Office of the Courts, circuit courts, and prosecuting attorneys, not including deputy prosecuting attorneys;

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation; and

All administrative, academic, classified, and nonclassified employees of the state-supported institutions of higher education.

Any agency, board, commission, bureau, council, or program exempted under this subsection from the direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section may elect to enter the electronic warrants transfer system on a voluntary basis.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may establish any special account necessary to facilitate direct deposit of employee salaries or wages.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 2005, No. 1887, § 1, subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section read “As a condition of employment, a person hired or appointed to a position in any agency in state government on or after the effective date of this act shall be required to accept payment of salary or wages by electronic warrants transfer.”

As enacted by Acts 2005, No. 1887, § 1, subdivision (a)(3) of this section read “The direct deposit requirement set forth in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not apply to a person who is in the employment of the state prior to the effective date of this act and subsequently receives a promotion appointment, transfer, or other change in position within the same personnel system on or after the effective date of this act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(1)(E).

The department shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 823, § 3, provided: “Rules.

“(a)The State Insurance Department shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this act.

“(b)(1)When adopting the initial rules to implement this act, the final rule shall be filed with the Secretary of State for adoption under §25-15-204(f):

“(A)On or before January 1, 2020; or

“(B)If approval under §10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1, 2020, as soon as practicable after approval under §10-3-309.

“(2)The department shall file the proposed rule with the Legislative Council under §10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2020, so that the Legislative Council may consider the rule for approval before January 1, 2020”.

Cross References. Higher education expenditure restrictions, §6-63-301 et seq.

Procedures for administering unanticipated miscellaneous federal funds, §19-7-501 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 199, § 11: July 1, 1969.

Acts 1969, No. 663, § 2: July 1, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 199 of 1969 establishes a Uniform Classification and Compensation Plan to be applicable to most State agencies; that said Act 199 will be applicable from and after July 1, 1969; that a number of agencies who require the services of personnel possessing medical degrees may find it difficult to employ new personnel at the beginning salary step under such Compensation Plan; and, that in order to enable such agencies to obtain competent personnel from and after the effective date of this Act, special provisions are necessary to enable the Personnel Division of the State Administration Department to make exceptions to the beginning salary schedule where necessary. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1969.”

Acts 1971, No. 749, § 5: Apr. 28, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure in order to insure that the State receives its fair share of qualified persons to carry out the services of State Government in a manner that is efficient and economical. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 750, § 6: Apr. 28, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure in order to insure that the State receives its fair share of qualified persons to carry out the services of State Government in a manner that is efficient and economical. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 286, § 5: Mar. 12, 1973, except § 1, effective July 1, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure in order to insure that the State receives its fair share of qualified persons to carry out the services of State Government in a manner that is efficient and economical. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval, provided that the Compensation Plan provided in Section One (1) of this Act shall not become effective until July 1, 1973.”

Acts 1973, No. 873, § 11: July 1, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure and revise the classification plan and institute the necessary provisions to accomplish this. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1973.”

Acts 1974 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 39, § 7: July 11, 1974. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in Extraordinary Session, that the rapid increase in inflation has greatly reduced the effective purchasing power of the State employees salaries and that immediate passage of this Act is necessary to prevent irreparable harm to the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 932, § 6: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure and revise the Classification Plan, in order to attract and maintain competent employees; and that it is essential to provide for the implementation of such changes. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1977, No. 289, § 2: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-first General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure in order to attract and retain competent employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1979, No. 3, § 3: Jan. 18, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that Arkansas state employees should be compensated at the minimum wage established under the Federal Fair Labor Standards Act, and that such minimum wage is to be increased on January 1, 1979, and that to delay the increases in compensation provided herein for 90 days after the adjournment of this General Assembly would place Arkansas in a non-competitive position with private industry and would unnecessarily delay salary increases to those state employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 828, § 7: July 1, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Second General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure and revise the Classification Plan, in order to attract and maintain competent employees; and that it is essential to provide for the implementation of such changes. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1979.”

Acts 1981, No. 19, § 3: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the existing Uniform Classification and Compensation Plan is inadequate; that the revised plan contained in this Act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 650, § 7: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure and revise the Classification Plan, in order to attract and maintain competent employees; and that it is essential to provide for the implementation of such changes. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 695, § 5: Mar. 24, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law pertaining to compensatory time under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act is vague and that this Act is immediately necessary to eliminate confusion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 68, § 3: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the existing Uniform Classification and Compensation Plan is inadequate; that the revised plan contained in this Act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 931, § 7: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a Uniform Personnel Classification Plan for State Agencies and to provide that essential changes are implemented for the adequate functioning of those State Agencies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 101, § 3: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure in order to recruit and retain competent employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1985, No. 981, § 10: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a Uniform Personnel Classification Plan for State Agencies and to provide that essential changes are implemented for the adequate functioning of those State Agencies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1989, No. 793, § 19: Mar. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current Uniform Compensation Plan is inadequate to pay the employees of the various state agencies and institutions of higher education; that the current Uniform Personnel Classification plan describing the job titles and grade levels of state employees is no longer descriptive of the jobs being performed and the levels of pay needed to compensate them; and therefore that it is essential for the State of Arkansas to adopt a more competitive salary structure and to adopt more descriptive job titles and appropriate grade levels to provide for the essential functioning of state agencies and state supported institutions of higher education. Therefore, in order to keep the government services of the State of Arkansas functioning properly, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 202, § 13: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that expanded development and coordination of early childhood programs is essential to meeting the developmental and educational needs of young children in Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect of July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 1148, § 15: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is essential to adopt a revised Uniform Classification System for state agencies and institutions of higher education; that the revisions must begin at the beginning of the new biennium; and that these changes are essential for the continued functioning of the state agencies and institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 708, § 6: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is essential to adopt a revised Uniform Classification System for state agencies and institutions of higher education; that the revisions must begin at the beginning of the new biennium; and that these changes are essential for the continued functioning of the state agencies and institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 966, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in Regular Session, that it is essential to adopt a revised Uniform Classification System for state agencies and institutions of higher education; that the revisions must begin at the beginning of the biennium; and that these changes are essential for the continued functioning of the state agencies and institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 992, § 5: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in Regular Session, that it is essential to adopt a revised Uniform Compensation Plan for state agencies and institutions of higher education; that the revisions must begin at the beginning of the new biennium; and that these changes are essential for the continued functioning of state agencies and institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 179, § 38: Feb. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 530, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-first General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas reqruires the General Assembly to set the titles and pay of state employees and that changes to titles and salaries must coincide with the begining of the fiscal year. Therefor, this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 532, § 8: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-first General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that changes to the state compensation plan must take effect at the same time as approprations made to pay salaries for the various agencies; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agencies and insitutions for which the appropriations are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 899, § 11: March 27, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a substantial number of state employees are eligible for salary increases on July 1, 1997; that this act prescribes the procedure to be followed in awarding salary increases to classified state employees; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted the procedures prescribed herein will not be in effect until after July 1, 1997. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 813, § 5: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that changes to the state compensation plan must take effect at the same time as appropriations made to pay salaries for the various agencies. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1019, § 10: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas requires the General Assembly to set the titles and pay of state employees and that changes to titles and salaries must coincide with the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 1461, § 14: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that several position changes have been incorporated into agencies' budgets to begin July 1, 2001 and that changes to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act must also take effect at that time to prevent confusion and uncertainty. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1462, § 2: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that changes in employee classifications title and grades are incorporated into the various appropriation acts for the 2001-2003 biennial period and this law must take effect at the same time as the beginning of the fiscal year in which the new budgets begin. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, No. 1794, § 2: Apr. 19, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that it is necessary to protect employees of the Alexander Youth Center from loss of pay as a result of privatization of the Center; and that in order to provide adequate protection to the employees this act should become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 923, § 2: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in title and grades in the state compensation system have been approved for use by state agencies; that these changes must go into effect at the beginning of the fiscal year when the new agency budgets go into effect; and that this act is immediately necessary because state agencies will not be able to function properly without this act taking effect on the first day of the new fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 8: July 1, 2003, except § 7, effective May 8, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in compensation levels enacted during the previous session of the General Assembly were applicable to the current biennium and that without this act becoming effective at the beginning of the fiscal year state employees could not be compensated at the approved level. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and Section 7 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto a bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto; and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2005, No. 1852, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in title and grades in the state compensation system have been approved for use by state agencies; that these changes must go into effect at the beginning of the fiscal year when the new agency budgets go into effect; and that this act is necessary on July 1, 2005, because state agencies will not be able to function properly without this act taking effect on the first day of the new fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 2198, § 5: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in title and grades in the state compensation system have been approved for use by state agencies; that these changes must go into effect at the beginning of the fiscal year when the new agency budgets go into effect; and that this act is necessary on July 1, 2005, because state agencies will not be able to function properly without this act taking effect on the first day of the new fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 375, § 3: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act changes the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act and should become effective July 1, 2007, for consistent application and to avoid confusion and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 376, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in title and grades in the state compensation system have been approved for use by state agencies; that these changes must go into effect at the beginning of the fiscal year when the new agency budgets go into effect; and that this act is necessary on July 1, 2007, because state agencies will not be able to function properly without this act taking effect on the first day of the new fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 15: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is immediately necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 1017, § 11: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state salary classification schedules must be updated and revised; that the fiscal year for state employees begins each July 1; and that this act is essential and immediately necessary to implement the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act and to ensure the continued, uninterrupted operation of state government and services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 1321, § 7: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state salary classification schedules must be updated and revised; that the fiscal year for state employees begins each July 1; and that this act is essential and immediately necessary to implement the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act and to ensure the continued, uninterrupted operation of state government and services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2014, No. 285, § 86: July 1, 2014. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2014 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2014 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2014.”

Acts 2015, No. 1007, § 7: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state salary classification schedules must be updated and revised; that the fiscal year for state employees begins each July 1; and that this act is essential and immediately necessary to implement the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., and to ensure the continued and uninterrupted operation of state government and state government services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2017, No. 365, § 29: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 599, § 5: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by theGeneral Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees of institutions of higher education begins annually on July 1; and that the implementation of the Higher Education Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1887, § 1; 2007, No. 827, § 174; 2017, No. 707, §
71.

21-5-110. State Insurance Department — Arkansas Firefighter Cancer Relief Network Trust Fund — Proceeds.

(1)The State Insurance Department shall maintain the Arkansas Firefighter Cancer Relief Network Trust Fund.

(A)The purpose of the trust fund is to fund relief for firefighters who are diagnosed with cancer and participating in a firefighter cancer relief network created and governed by the Arkansas Association of Fire Chiefs, the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters Association, and the Arkansas State Firefighters Association, Inc., from funds donated under this section.

The department shall deposit any donated funds received under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section into the fund.

The Arkansas Association of Fire Chiefs, the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters Association, and the Arkansas State Firefighters Association, Inc., shall determine eligibility and award amounts under the rules promulgated by the department.

The entities named in subsection (b) of this section shall return to the department any excess funding which has been donated to the fund for the purpose of funding a firefighter cancer relief network.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 823, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Uniform Classification and Compensation Act

21-5-201. Title.

This subchapter may be referred to and cited as the “Uniform Classification and Compensation Act”.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3201.